Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB516.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 610 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Deception" includes but is not limited to the knowing communication of
false statements about evidence, the misrepresentation of the accuracy of
the facts, or the making of false statements regarding leniency; and
(b) "Psychologically manipulative interrogation tactics" include but are not
limited to:
1. Practices that rely on deceit or a presumption of guilt;
2. Techniques to scare or intimidate the child by repetitively asserting the
child is guilty despite his or her denials, or exaggerating the
magnitude of the charges or the strength of the evidence, including
suggesting the existence of evidence that does not exist;
3. Practices that minimize the moral seriousness of the offense, by falsely
communicating that the conduct is justified, excusable, or accidental;
4. Direct or indirect promises of leniency; or
5. Employment of the false or forced choice strategy, where the child is
encouraged to select one (1) of two (2) options, both incriminatory, but
one is characterized as morally or legally justified or excusable.
(2) During a custodial interrogation of a child relating to the commission of a public
offense, a law enforcement officer shall not employ threats, physical harm,
deception, or psychologically manipulative interrogation tactics.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to interrogations of a child if:
(a) The law enforcement officer who questioned the child reasonably believed
the information the officer sought was necessary to protect life or property
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2025 2:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1462
from an imminent threat; and
(b) The questions by law enforcement officers were limited to those questions
that were reasonably necessary to obtain information related to the
imminent threat.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF THE KENTUCKY RULES OF
EVIDENCE IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this rule, a statement made by a child in
the course of a custodial interrogation that did not comply with applicable
statutes is not admissible against the child in any civil, criminal, or juvenile
proceeding.
(b) Evidence excluded in subdivision (a) of this rule is admissible if otherwise
admissible under these rules, and offered by the plaintiff in an action for
damages arising from the interrogation.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2025 2:57 PM Jacketed